test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-lex_kiainu_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - uáinu: # ok KIAINU
    uáinu+N+Sg+Nom:  uáiˊnu
    uáinu+N+Sg+Gen:  uáinu
    uáinu+N+Sg+Acc:  uáinu
    uáinu+N+Sg+Ill:  uáinun
    uáinu+N+Sg+Loc:  uáinust
    uáinu+N+Sg+Com:  uáiˊnoin
    uáinu+N+Sg+Abe:  uáˊinuttáá
    uáinu+N+Ess:  uáiˊnun
    uáinu+N+Par:  uáiˊnud
    uáinu+N+Pl+Nom:  uáinuh
    uáinu+N+Pl+Gen: [uáinui, uáˊinui]
    uáinu+N+Pl+Acc:  uáinuid
    uáinu+N+Pl+Ill:  uáiˊnoid
    uáinu+N+Pl+Loc:  uáinuin
    uáinu+N+Pl+Com:  uáˊinuiguin
    uáinu+N+Pl+Abe:  uáˊinuittáá


  Noun - kuáivu: # ok KIAINU
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáiˊvu
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Gen:  kuáivu
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Acc:  kuáivu
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Ill:  kuáivun
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Loc:  kuáivust
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Com:  kuáiˊvoin
    kuáivu+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊivuttáá
    kuáivu+N+Ess:  kuáiˊvun
    kuáivu+N+Par:  kuáiˊvud
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Nom:  kuáivuh
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Gen: [kuáivui, kuáˊivui]
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Acc:  kuáivuid
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Ill:  kuáiˊvoid
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Loc:  kuáivuin
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊivuiguin
    kuáivu+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊivuittáá

  Noun - kiäinu: # ok KIAINU
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Nom:  kiäiˊnu
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Gen:  kiäinu
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Acc:  kiäinu
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Ill:  kiäinun
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Loc:  kiäinust
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Com:  kiäiˊnoin
    kiäinu+N+Sg+Abe:  kiäˊinuttáá
    kiäinu+N+Ess:  kiäiˊnun
    kiäinu+N+Par:  kiäiˊnud
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Nom:  kiäinuh
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Gen: [kiäinui, kiäˊinui]
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Acc:  kiäinuid
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Ill:  kiäiˊnoid
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Loc:  kiäinuin
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Com:  kiäˊinuiguin
    kiäinu+N+Pl+Abe:  kiäˊinuittáá
    
  Noun - vuábdu: # ok KIAINU
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Nom:  vuábˊdu
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Gen:  vuábdu
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Acc:  vuábdu
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Ill:  vuábdun
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Loc:  vuábdust
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Com:  vuábˊdoin
    vuábdu+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊbduttáá
    vuábdu+N+Ess:  vuábˊdun
    vuábdu+N+Par:  vuábˊdud
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Nom:  vuábduh
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Gen: [vuábdui, vuáˊbdui]
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Acc:  vuábduid
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Ill:  vuábˊdoid
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Loc:  vuábduin
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊbduiguin
    vuábdu+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊbduittáá

  Noun - luándu: # ok KIAINU
    luándu+N+Sg+Nom:  luánˊdu
    luándu+N+Sg+Gen:  luándu
    luándu+N+Sg+Acc:  luándu
    luándu+N+Sg+Ill:  luándun
    luándu+N+Sg+Loc:  luándust
    luándu+N+Sg+Com:  luánˊdoin
    luándu+N+Sg+Abe:  luáˊnduttáá
    luándu+N+Ess:  luánˊdun
    luándu+N+Par:  luánˊdud
    luándu+N+Pl+Nom:  luánduh
    luándu+N+Pl+Gen: [luándui, luáˊndui]
    luándu+N+Pl+Acc:  luánduid
    luándu+N+Pl+Ill:  luánˊdoid
    luándu+N+Pl+Loc:  luánduin
    luándu+N+Pl+Com:  luáˊnduiguin
    luándu+N+Pl+Abe:  luáˊnduittáá

  Noun - nuárju: # ok KIAINU
    nuárju+N+Sg+Nom:  nuárˊju
    nuárju+N+Sg+Gen:  nuárju
    nuárju+N+Sg+Ill:  nuárjun
    nuárju+N+Sg+Loc:  nuárjust
    nuárju+N+Sg+Com:  nuárˊjoin
    nuárju+N+Sg+Abe:  nuáˊrjuttáá
    nuárju+N+Ess:  nuárˊjun
    nuárju+N+Par:  nuárˊjud
    nuárju+N+Pl+Nom:  nuárjuh
    nuárju+N+Pl+Gen: [nuárjui, nuáˊrjui]
    nuárju+N+Pl+Acc:  nuárjuid
    nuárju+N+Pl+Ill:  nuárˊjoid
    nuárju+N+Pl+Loc:  nuárjuin
    nuárju+N+Pl+Com:  nuáˊrjuiguin
    nuárju+N+Pl+Abe:  nuáˊrjuittáá

  Noun - kuávlu: # ok KIAINU
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Nom:  kuávˊlu
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Gen:  kuávlu
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Acc:  kuávlu
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Ill:  kuávlun
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Loc:  kuávlust
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Com:  kuávˊloin
    kuávlu+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊvluttáá
    kuávlu+N+Ess:  kuávˊlun
    kuávlu+N+Par:  kuávˊlud
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Nom:  kuávluh
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Gen: [kuávlui, kuáˊvlui]
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Acc:  kuávluid
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Ill:  kuávˊloid
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Loc:  kuávluin
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊvluiguin
    kuávlu+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊvluittáá

  Noun - kuáhtu: # ok KIAINU
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Nom:  kuáhˊtu
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Gen:  kuáhtu
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Acc:  kuáhtu
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Ill:  kuáhtun
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Loc:  kuáhtust
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Com:  kuáhˊtoin
    kuáhtu+N+Sg+Abe:  kuáˊhtuttáá
    kuáhtu+N+Ess:  kuáhˊtun
    kuáhtu+N+Par:  kuáhˊtud
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Nom:  kuáhtuh
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Gen:  [kuáhtui, kuáˊhtui]
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Acc:  kuáhtuid
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Ill:  kuáhˊtoid
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Loc:  kuáhtuin
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Com:  kuáˊhtuiguin
    kuáhtu+N+Pl+Abe:  kuáˊhtuittáá

  Noun - uástu: # ok KIAINU
    uástu+N+Sg+Nom:  uásˊtu
    uástu+N+Sg+Gen:  uástu
    uástu+N+Sg+Acc:  uástu
    uástu+N+Sg+Ill:  uástun
    uástu+N+Sg+Loc:  uástust
    uástu+N+Sg+Com:  uásˊtoin
    uástu+N+Sg+Abe:  uáˊstuttáá
    uástu+N+Ess:  uásˊtun
    uástu+N+Par:  uásˊtud
    uástu+N+Pl+Nom:  uástuh
    uástu+N+Pl+Gen:  [uástui, uáˊstui]
    uástu+N+Pl+Acc:  uástuid
    uástu+N+Pl+Ill:  uásˊtoid
    uástu+N+Pl+Loc:  uástuin
    uástu+N+Pl+Com:  uáˊstuiguin
    uástu+N+Pl+Abe:  uáˊstuittáá

  Noun - tuáršu: # ok KIAINU
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Nom:  tuárˊšu
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Gen:  tuáršu
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Acc:  tuáršu
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Ill:  tuáršun
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Loc:  tuáršust
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Com:  tuárˊšoin
    tuáršu+N+Sg+Abe:  tuáˊršuttáá
    tuáršu+N+Ess:  tuárˊšun
    tuáršu+N+Par:  tuárˊšud
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Nom:  tuáršuh
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Gen:  [tuáršui, tuáˊršui]
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Acc:  tuáršuid
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Ill:  tuárˊšoid
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Loc:  tuáršuin
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Com:  tuáˊršuiguin
    tuáršu+N+Pl+Abe:  tuáˊršuittáá

  Noun - piäldu: # ok KIAINU
    piäldu+N+Sg+Nom:  piälˊdu
    piäldu+N+Sg+Gen:  piäldu
    piäldu+N+Sg+Acc:  piäldu
    piäldu+N+Sg+Ill:  piäldun
    piäldu+N+Sg+Loc:  piäldust
    piäldu+N+Sg+Com:  piälˊdoin
    piäldu+N+Sg+Abe:  piäˊlduttáá
    piäldu+N+Ess:  piälˊdun
    piäldu+N+Par:  piälˊdud
    piäldu+N+Pl+Nom:  piälduh
    piäldu+N+Pl+Gen:  [piäldui, piäˊldui]
    piäldu+N+Pl+Acc:  piälduid
    piäldu+N+Pl+Ill:  piälˊdoid
    piäldu+N+Pl+Loc:  piälduin
    piäldu+N+Pl+Com:  piäˊlduiguin
    piäldu+N+Pl+Abe:  piäˊlduittáá

  Noun - piärgu: # ok KIAINU
    piärgu+N+Sg+Nom:  piärˊgu
    piärgu+N+Sg+Gen:  piärgu
    piärgu+N+Sg+Acc:  piärgu
    piärgu+N+Sg+Ill:  piärgun
    piärgu+N+Sg+Loc:  piärgust
    piärgu+N+Sg+Com:  piärˊgoin
    piärgu+N+Sg+Abe:  piäˊrguttáá
    piärgu+N+Ess:  piärˊgun
    piärgu+N+Par:  piärˊgud
    piärgu+N+Pl+Nom:  piärguh
    piärgu+N+Pl+Gen:  [piärgui, piäˊrgui]
    piärgu+N+Pl+Acc:  piärguid
    piärgu+N+Pl+Ill:  piärˊgoid
    piärgu+N+Pl+Loc:  piärguin
    piärgu+N+Pl+Com:  piäˊrguiguin
    piärgu+N+Pl+Abe:  piäˊrguittáá

  Noun - vuáisá: # removed from fadda to kiainu
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Nom:  vuáiˊsá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Gen:  vuáisá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Acc:  vuáisá
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Ill:  vuáisán
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Loc:  vuáisást
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Com:  vuáiˊsáin
    vuáisá+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊisáttáá
    vuáisá+N+Ess:  vuáiˊsán
    vuáisá+N+Par:  vuáiˊsád
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Nom:  vuáisáh
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Gen: [vuáisái, vuáˊisái]
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Acc:  vuáisáid
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Ill:  vuáiˊsáid
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Loc:  vuáisáin
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊisáiguin
    vuáisá+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊisáittáá

  Noun - kiäčču: # ok 
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Nom:  kiäčˊču
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Gen:  kiäj̣u
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Acc:  kiäj̣u
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Ill:  kiäčun
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Loc:  kiäj̣ust
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Com:  kiäj̣oin
    kiäčču+N+Sg+Abe:  kiäˊj̣uttáá
    kiäčču+N+Ess:  kiäčˊčun
    kiäčču+N+Par:  kiäčˊčud
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Nom:  kiäj̣uh
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Gen: [kiäj̣ui, kiäˊj̣ui]
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Acc:  kiäj̣uid
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Ill:  kiäj̣oid
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Loc:  kiäj̣uin
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Com:  kiäˊj̣uiguin
    kiäčču+N+Pl+Abe:  kiäˊj̣uittáá

  Noun - suáittu: # ok 
    suáittu+N+Sg+Nom:  suáiˊttu
    suáittu+N+Sg+Gen:  suáitu
    suáittu+N+Sg+Acc:  suáitu
    suáittu+N+Sg+Ill:  suáitun
    suáittu+N+Sg+Loc:  suáitust
    suáittu+N+Sg+Com:  suáiˊttoin
    suáittu+N+Sg+Abe:  suáˊituttáá
    suáittu+N+Ess:  suáiˊttun
    suáittu+N+Par:  suáiˊttud
    suáittu+N+Pl+Nom:  suáituh
    suáittu+N+Pl+Gen: [suáitui, suáˊitui]
    suáittu+N+Pl+Acc:  suáituid
    suáittu+N+Pl+Ill:  suáiˊttoid
    suáittu+N+Pl+Loc:  suáituin
    suáittu+N+Pl+Com:  suáˊituiguin
    suáittu+N+Pl+Abe:  suáˊituittáá

  Noun - suánju: # ok; nj is actually one consonant
    suánju+N+Sg+Nom:  suáṇju
    suánju+N+Sg+Gen:  suánju
    suánju+N+Sg+Acc:  suánju
    suánju+N+Sg+Ill:  suáṇjun
    suánju+N+Sg+Loc:  suánjust
    suánju+N+Sg+Com:  suánjoin
    suánju+N+Sg+Abe:  suáˊnjuttáá
    suánju+N+Ess:  suánnjun
    suánju+N+Par:  suánnjud
    suánju+N+Pl+Nom:  suánjuh
    suánju+N+Pl+Gen: [suánjui, suáˊnjui]
    suánju+N+Pl+Acc:  suánjuid
    suánju+N+Pl+Ill:  suánjoid
    suánju+N+Pl+Loc:  suánjuin
    suánju+N+Pl+Com:  suáˊnjuiguin
    suánju+N+Pl+Abe:  suáˊnjuittáá

  Noun - juávkku: # ok 
    juávkku+N+Sg+Nom:  juávˊkku
    juávkku+N+Sg+Gen:  juávhu
    juávkku+N+Sg+Acc:  juávhu
    juávkku+N+Sg+Ill:  juávkun
    juávkku+N+Sg+Loc:  juávhust
    juávkku+N+Sg+Com:  juávˊhoin
    juávkku+N+Sg+Abe:  juáˊvhuttáá
    juávkku+N+Ess:  juávˊkkun
    juávkku+N+Par:  juávˊkkud
    juávkku+N+Pl+Nom:  juávhuh
    juávkku+N+Pl+Gen: [juávhui, juáˊvhui]
    juávkku+N+Pl+Acc:  juávhuid
    juávkku+N+Pl+Ill:  juávˊhoid
    juávkku+N+Pl+Loc:  juávhuin
    juávkku+N+Pl+Com:  juáˊvhuiguin
    juávkku+N+Pl+Abe:  juáˊvhuittáá

  Noun - puákku: # ok 
    puákku+N+Sg+Nom:  puákˊku
    puákku+N+Sg+Gen:  puáhu
    puákku+N+Sg+Acc:  puáhu
    puákku+N+Sg+Ill:  puákun
    puákku+N+Sg+Loc:  puáhust
    puákku+N+Sg+Com:  puáhˊhoin
    puákku+N+Sg+Abe:  puáˊhuttáá
    puákku+N+Ess:  puákˊkun
    puákku+N+Par:  puákˊkud
    puákku+N+Pl+Nom:  puáhuh
    puákku+N+Pl+Gen:  [puáhui, puáˊhui]
    puákku+N+Pl+Acc:  puáhuid
    puákku+N+Pl+Ill:  puáhˊhoid
    puákku+N+Pl+Loc:  puáhuin
    puákku+N+Pl+Com:  puáˊhuiguin
    puákku+N+Pl+Abe:  puáˊhuittáá

  Noun - ruávvu: # ok 
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Nom:  ruávˊvu
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Gen:  ruáṿu
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Acc:  ruáṿu
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Ill:  ruáṿun
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Loc:  ruáṿust
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Com:  ruávˊvoin
    ruávvu+N+Sg+Abe:  ruáˊṿuttáá
    ruávvu+N+Ess:  ruávˊvun
    ruávvu+N+Par:  ruávˊvud
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Nom:  ruáṿuh
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Gen:  [ruáṿui, ruáˊṿui]
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Acc:  ruáṿuid
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Ill:  ruávˊvoid
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Loc:  ruáṿuin
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Com:  ruáˊṿuiguin
    ruávvu+N+Pl+Abe:  ruáˊṿuittáá


  Noun - vuálppu: # ok 
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Nom:  vuálˊppu
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Gen:  vuálpu
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Acc:  vuálpu
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Ill:  vuálpun
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Loc:  vuálpust
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Com:  vuálˊppoin
    vuálppu+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊlputtáá
    vuálppu+N+Ess:  vuálˊppun
    vuálppu+N+Par:  vuálˊppud
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Nom:  vuálpuh
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Gen:  [vuálpui, vuáˊlpui]
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Acc:  vuálpuid
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Ill:  vuálˊppoid
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Loc:  vuálpuin
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊlpuiguin
    vuálppu+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊlpuittáá

  Noun - luákká:
    luákká+N+Sg+Nom:  luákˊká
    luákká+N+Sg+Gen:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Acc:  luáhá
    luákká+N+Sg+Ill:  luákán
    luákká+N+Sg+Loc:  luáhást
    luákká+N+Sg+Com:  luáhˊháin
    luákká+N+Sg+Abe:  luáˊháttáá
    luákká+N+Ess:  luákˊkán
    luákká+N+Par:  luákˊkád
    luákká+N+Pl+Nom:  luáháh
    luákká+N+Pl+Gen: [luáhái, luáˊhái]
    luákká+N+Pl+Acc:  luáháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Ill:  luáhˊháid
    luákká+N+Pl+Loc:  luáháin
    luákká+N+Pl+Com:  luáˊháiguin
    luákká+N+Pl+Abe:  luáˊháittáá

  Noun - vuárkká:
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Nom:  vuárˊkká
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Gen:  vuárhá
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Acc:  vuárhá
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Ill:  vuárkán
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Loc:  vuárhást
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Com:  vuárˊháin
    vuárkká+N+Sg+Abe:  vuáˊrháttáá
    vuárkká+N+Ess:  vuárˊkkán
    vuárkká+N+Par:  vuárˊkkád
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Nom:  vuárháh
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Gen: [vuárhái, vuáˊrhái]
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Acc:  vuárháid
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Ill:  vuárˊháid
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Loc:  vuárháin
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Com:  vuáˊrháiguin
    vuárkká+N+Pl+Abe:  vuáˊrháittáá
